Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4209
Duration of appointment.

A guardian ad litem's appointment begins at the time he or she is appointed by the court and does not end until the court allows the guardian ad litem to withdraw as guardian ad litem, terminates the appointment of the guardian ad litem, removes or suspends the guardian ad litem, or appoints the guardian ad litem to serve in another capacity.

Laws 2016, LB934, § 22.